Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-405
Warrant; misdemeanor, complainant; costs.

When the offense charged is a misdemeanor, the magistrate, before issuing the warrant, may, at his discretion, require the complainant to acknowledge himself responsible for costs in case the complaint shall be dismissed, which acknowledgment of security for costs shall be entered upon the docket; and the magistrate on dismissal may, if in his opinion the complaint was without probable cause, enter a judgment against such complainant for costs made thereon. In case the magistrate shall consider such complainant wholly irresponsible, such magistrate may, in his discretion, refuse to issue any warrant unless the complainant procure some responsible surety to the satisfaction of such magistrate for the costs in case of such dismissal, and such surety shall acknowledge himself so bound, and the magistrate shall enter it on his docket.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 287, p. 790;

R.S.1913, § 8941;

C.S.1922, § 9965;

C.S.1929, § 29-405;

R.S.1943, § 29-405.

Constable cannot demand his fees in advance. Beach v. State ex rel. Emmons, 27 Neb. 398, 43 N.W. 177 (1889).

This section does not apply to complaint by prosecuting officer. State ex rel. Thomas v. McCutcheon, 20 Neb. 304, 30 N.W. 58 (1886).

Costs can be adjudged against complainant only after finding that complaint was without probable cause. Cobbey v. Berger, 13 Neb. 463, 14 N.W. 396 (1882).